New Jersey, session 221, A3128.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1[1.  Section 98 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-362) is amended to read as follows: 98.  a.  The combined value of all tax credits awarded under the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276); the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287); the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302); the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310); the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321); the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335); the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.); and section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4) shall not exceed an overall cap of $11.5 billion over a nine-year period, subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in this section.  Of this $11.5 billion, $2.5 billion shall be reserved for transformative projects approved under the Aspire Program. b.    (1) The total value of tax credits awarded under any constituent program of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.) shall be subject to the following annual limitations, except as otherwise provided in subsection c. of this section: (a)   for tax credits awarded under the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $50 million; (b)   for tax credits awarded under the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $50 million; (c)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $60 million and the total value of tax credits awarded over the entirety of the nine-year period shall not exceed $300,000,000; (d)   for tax credits awarded under the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $40 million; (e)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $200 million, except that during each of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $130 million for projects located in the 13 northern counties of the State, and the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $70 million for projects located in the eight southern counties of the State.  If during any of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority awards tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitation for projects located in northern counties or southern counties, as applicable, the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be [available to be deployed by the authority in a subsequent year, provided that the uncommitted portion of tax credits shall be awarded for projects located in the applicable geographic area, except that (i) after the completion of the third year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy 50 percent of the uncommitted portion of tax credits from any previous year without consideration to the county in which a project is located; and (ii) after the completion of the sixth year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy all available tax credits, including the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year, without consideration to the county in which a project is located] reallocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.), for the purposes authorized in P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the tax credits reallocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency shall not be subject to any requirements or conditions of the New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020, P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), as amended or supplemented; (f)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $1.1 billion.  If the authority awards tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitation, then the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be made available for qualified offshore wind projects awarded under section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4), pursuant to subparagraph (h) of this paragraph, or New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies awarded under sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b), pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and subsection d. of this section.  During each of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $715 million for projects located in the northern counties of the State, and the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $385 million for projects located in the southern counties of the State under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.).  If during any of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority awards tax credits under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), in an amount less than the annual limitation for projects located in northern counties or southern counties, as applicable, the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in a subsequent year, provided that the uncommitted portion of tax credits shall be awarded for projects located in the applicable geographic area, except that (i) after the completion of the third year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy 50 percent of the uncommitted portion of tax credits for any previous year without consideration to the county in which a project is located; and (ii) after the completion of the sixth year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy all available tax credits, including the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year, without consideration to the county in which a project is located; (g)   except as provided in subparagraph (j) of this paragraph, for tax credits awarded for transformative projects under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), the total value of tax credits awarded during the nine-year period shall not exceed $2.5 billion.  The total value of tax credits awarded for transformative projects in a given year shall not be subject to an annual limitation, except that the total value of tax credits awarded to any transformative project shall not exceed $400 million; (h)   from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $350,000,000 shall be made available for qualified offshore wind projects awarded a credit pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4) during the first three years of the nine-year period; (i)    beginning in fiscal year 2023, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, additional amounts shall be made available for New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b); and (j)    beginning in fiscal year 2024, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 may be annually transferred for the award to transformative projects under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), provided that: (i) the remaining allocation of tax credits otherwise available for transformative projects, pursuant to subparagraph (g) of this paragraph, is less than $1,000,000,000; and (ii) the authority board determines that the transfer of tax credits is warranted based on such criteria as the authority deems appropriate, which may include the criteria set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection.  If a transfer of tax credits is made pursuant to this subparagraph, the authority shall award no greater than 65 percent of the tax credits transferred pursuant to this subparagraph to transformative projects located in the northern counties of the State and no greater than 35 percent of the tax credits transferred pursuant to this subparagraph to transformative projects located in the southern counties of the State. (2)   The authority may in any given year determine that it is in the State's interest to approve an amount of tax credits in excess of the annual limitations set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, but in no event more than $200,000,000 in excess of the annual limitation, upon a determination by the authority board that such increase is warranted based on specific criteria that may include: (i)    the increased demand for opportunities to create or retain employment and investment in the State as indicated by the volume of project applications and the amount of tax credits being sought by those applications; (ii)   the need to protect the State's economic position in the event of an economic downturn; (iii)  the quality of project applications and the net economic benefit to the State and municipalities associated with those applications; (iv)  opportunities for project applications to strengthen or protect the competitiveness of the State under the prevailing market conditions; (v)   enhanced access to employment and investment for underserved populations in distressed municipalities and qualified incentives tracts; (vi)  increased investment and employment in high-growth technology sectors and in projects that entail collaboration with education institutions in the State; (vii)             increased development proximate to mass transit facilities; (viii)            any other factor deemed relevant by the authority. c.     In the event that the authority in any year approves projects for tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitations set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section, then the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in future years for projects under the same program; provided however, that in no event shall the aggregate amount of tax credits approved be in excess of the overall cap of $11.5 billion, and in no event shall the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year be deployed after the conclusion of the nine-year period. d.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the uncommitted balance of the total value of tax credits authorized for award by the authority pursuant to subparagraph (f) of paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 et seq.), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), shall be made available for tax credits allowed to New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b).  The value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, made available to New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to this subsection shall be as follows: (1)   in fiscal year 2023, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies; (2)   in fiscal year 2024, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies; and (3)   in fiscal year 2025, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies. If the value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, approved to New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies in any fiscal year pursuant to this subsection is less than the cumulative total amount of tax credits permitted to be approved in that fiscal year, the authority shall certify the amount of the remaining tax credits available for approval to each such category in that fiscal year, and shall increase the cumulative total amount of tax credits permitted to be approved for New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies in the subsequent fiscal year by the certified amount remaining for each such category from the prior fiscal year. (cf: P.L.2023, c.98, s.13)]1 2[11. Section 98 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-362) is amended to read as follows: 98.  a.  The combined value of all tax credits awarded under the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276); the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287); the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302); the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310); the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321); the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335); the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.); section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4) [,] ; and the Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act, P.L.2023, c.197 (C.        ), shall not exceed an overall cap of $11.5 billion over a nine-year period, subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in this section.  Of this $11.5 billion, $2.5 billion shall be reserved for transformative projects approved under the Aspire Program. b.    (1) The total value of tax credits awarded under any constituent program of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.) and the Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act, P.L.2023, c.197 (C.        ), subject to the following limitations, except as otherwise provided in subsection c. of this section: (a)   for tax credits awarded under the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $50 million; (b)   for tax credits awarded under the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $50 million; (c)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $60 million and the total value of tax credits awarded over the entirety of the nine-year period shall not exceed $300,000,000; (d)   for tax credits awarded under the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $40 million; (e)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321), and the Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act, P.L.2023, c.197 (C.        ), the total value of tax credits awarded during the nine-year period shall not exceed $1,200,000,000; provided, however, tax credits shall not be available under the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321), until January 1, 2026. Beginning January 1, 2026, the authority shall annually award tax credits under the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321), valuing no greater than $130 million for projects located in the 13 northern counties of the State, and the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $70 million for projects located in the eight southern counties of the State.  If during any year of operation of the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321), the authority awards tax credits pursuant to the program in an amount less than the annual limitation for projects located in northern counties or southern counties, as applicable, the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be [available to be deployed by the authority in a subsequent year without consideration to the county in which a project is located] reallocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.), for the purposes authorized in P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the tax credits reallocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency shall not be subject to any requirements or conditions of the New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020, P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), as amended or supplemented; (f)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $1.1 billion.  If the authority awards tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitation, then the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be made available for qualified offshore wind projects awarded under section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4), pursuant to subparagraph (h) of this paragraph, or New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies awarded under sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b), pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and subsection d. of this section.  During each of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $715 million for projects located in the northern counties of the State, and the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $385 million for projects located in the southern counties of the State under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.).  If during any of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority awards tax credits under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), in an amount less than the annual limitation for projects located in northern counties or southern counties, as applicable, the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in a subsequent year, provided that the uncommitted portion of tax credits shall be awarded for projects located in the applicable geographic area, except that (i) after the completion of the third year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy 50 percent of the uncommitted portion of tax credits for any previous year without consideration to the county in which a project is located; and (ii) after the completion of the sixth year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy all available tax credits, including the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year, without consideration to the county in which a project is located; (g)   except as provided in subparagraph (j) of this paragraph, for tax credits awarded for transformative projects under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), the total value of tax credits awarded during the nine-year period shall not exceed $2.5 billion. The total value of tax credits awarded for transformative projects in a given year shall not be subject to an annual limitation, except that the total value of tax credits awarded to any transformative project shall not exceed $400 million; (h)   from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $350,000,000 shall be made available for qualified offshore wind projects awarded a credit pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4) during the first three years of the nine-year period; (i)    beginning in fiscal year 2023, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, additional amounts shall be made available for New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b); and (j)    beginning in fiscal year 2024, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 may be annually transferred for the award to transformative projects under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), provided that: (i) the remaining allocation of tax credits otherwise available for transformative projects, pursuant to subparagraph (g) of this paragraph, is less than $1,000,000,000; and (ii) the authority board determines that the transfer of tax credits is warranted based on such criteria as the authority deems appropriate, which may include the criteria set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection.  If a transfer of tax credits is made pursuant to this subparagraph, the authority shall award no greater than 65 percent of the tax credits transferred pursuant to this subparagraph to transformative projects located in the northern counties of the State and no greater than 35 percent of the tax credits transferred pursuant to this subparagraph to transformative projects located in the southern counties of the State. (2)   The authority may in any given year determine that it is in the State's interest to approve an amount of tax credits in excess of the annual limitations set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, but in no event more than $200,000,000 in excess of the annual limitation, upon a determination by the authority board that such increase is warranted based on specific criteria that may include: (i) the increased demand for opportunities to create or retain employment and investment in the State as indicated by the volume of project applications and the amount of tax credits being sought by those applications; (ii) the need to protect the State's economic position in the event of an economic downturn; (iii) the quality of project applications and the net economic benefit to the State and municipalities associated with those applications; (iv) opportunities for project applications to strengthen or protect the competitiveness of the State under the prevailing market conditions; (v) enhanced access to employment and investment for underserved populations in distressed municipalities and qualified incentives tracts; (vi) increased investment and employment in high-growth technology sectors and in projects that entail collaboration with education institutions in the State; (vii) increased development proximate to mass transit facilities; (viii) any other factor deemed relevant by the authority. c.     In the event that the authority in any year approves projects for tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitations set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section, then the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in future years for projects under the same program; provided however, that in no event shall the aggregate amount of tax credits approved be in excess of the overall cap of $11.5 billion, and in no event shall the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year be deployed after the conclusion of the nine-year period. d.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the uncommitted balance of the total value of tax credits authorized for award by the authority pursuant to subparagraph (f) of paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 et seq.), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), shall be made available for tax credits allowed to New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b).  The value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, made available to New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to this subsection shall be as follows: (1) in fiscal year 2023, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies; (2) in fiscal year 2024, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies; and (3) in fiscal year 2025, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies. If the value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, approved to New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies in any fiscal year pursuant to this subsection is less than the cumulative total amount of tax credits permitted to be approved in that fiscal year, the authority shall certify the amount of the remaining tax credits available for approval to each such category in that fiscal year, and shall increase the cumulative total amount of tax credits permitted to be approved for New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies in the subsequent fiscal year by the certified amount remaining for each such category from the prior fiscal year.1 (cf: P.L.2023, c.197, s.13)]2 2[2.  (New section)  As used in sections 2 through 5 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Agency means the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.). Director means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. Low income housing tax credit means a tax credit provided through the federal Low Income Housing Tax Credit program pursuant to section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.42). Project financing gap means the same as the term is defined in section 55 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-323). Qualified project means a housing project that satisfies all eligibility requirements, as determined by the agency, for the receipt of a nine-percent low income housing tax credit, notwithstanding the availability or unavailability of such funds.]2 2[3.  (New section)  a.  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the agency may award the total amount of tax credits allocated to the agency pursuant to subparagraph (e) of paragraph (1) of subsection b. of section 98 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-362) in accordance with the provisions of this section. b.    The agency may award project financing tax credits to the developers of qualified projects, which tax credits shall supplement the value of any four-percent low income housing tax credits previously awarded to the developer for the qualified project, subject to the provisions of section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). c.     In addition to any other eligibility requirements that the agency may deem appropriate, the tax credits authorized under this section shall be available to any developer of a qualified project that: (1)   received a four-percent low income housing tax credit for the qualified project from the agency due to the total demand for nine-percent low income housing tax credits exceeding the total value of such tax credits available for distribution by the agency, as made available to the agency pursuant to section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.42); and (2)   demonstrates the existence of a project financing gap for the qualified project. d.    The total value of tax credits awarded to a developer shall equal the lesser of: (1)   the amount necessary to ensure that the qualified project receives a total subsidy in an amount equivalent to the receipt of a nine-percent low-income housing tax credit for the qualified project; or (2)   the amount of the project financing gap for the qualified project. e.     (1) All tax credits authorized pursuant to this section shall be awarded upon application to the agency, which applications shall be submitted in a form and manner prescribed by the agency.  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the agency may award some or all of the tax credits authorized under this section as part of an existing program operated by the agency on or before the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) or through the establishment of a new program to effectuate the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (2)   Upon approval of any application for tax credits pursuant to this section, and upon the satisfaction of such additional requirements as the agency deems appropriate, the agency shall provide the tax credit recipient and the director with a certificate of compliance indicating the amount of tax credits that the recipient may apply against the recipients tax liability, subject to the provisions of section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).]2 2[4.  (New section)  a.  The tax credits issued by the agency pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) may be applied against a developers tax liability under section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5.  To claim the tax credit amount for a privilege period, the developer shall submit to the director the certificate of compliance issued by the agency pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection e. of section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    (1) The director shall prescribe the order of priority of the application of the tax credit allowed under this section, together with any other credits allowed by law, against the tax imposed under section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for a privilege period.  The amount of the tax credit applied under this section against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for a privilege period, together with any other credits allowed by law, shall not reduce the tax liability to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5). (2)   A developer may carry forward any unused tax credit resulting from the limitations of paragraph (1) of this subsection or from the insufficiency of a tax liability, as applicable, for use in the five privilege periods next following the privilege period for which the credits are awarded. (3)   Credits granted to a partnership shall be passed through to the partners, members, or owners, respectively, pro-rata, or pursuant to an executed agreement among the partners, members, or owners documenting an alternate distribution method provided to the director accompanied by any additional information as the director may prescribe. c.     (1) A developer may apply to the director and the agency for a tax credit transfer certificate, covering one or more years, in lieu of the developer being allowed any amount of the credit against the tax liability of the developer.  An application for a tax credit transfer certificate shall not be approved unless the agency affirmatively determines, based on such considerations as the agency deems appropriate, that the sale or assignment of the tax credit transfer certificate is socially beneficial to the State. (2)   Upon approval of a developers application for a tax credit transfer certificate, and upon receipt thereof by the developer from the director and the agency, the tax credit transfer certificate may be sold or assigned, in full or in part, for an amount not less than $25,000, in the privilege period during which the developer receives the tax credit transfer certificate to another person, who may apply the credit against a tax liability pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5, subject to the carry-forward authorizations set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection b. of this section.  The certificate provided to the developer shall include a statement waiving the developer's right to claim the amount of the tax credit that the developer has elected to sell or assign against the developer's tax liability. (3)   The developer shall not sell or assign, including a collateral assignment, a tax credit transfer certificate allowed under this section for consideration received by the developer of less than 85 percent of the transferred credit amount before considering any further discounting to present value that shall be permitted. (4)   A purchaser or assignee of a tax credit transfer certificate pursuant to this section shall not make any subsequent transfers, assignments, or sales of the tax credit transfer certificate.]2 2[5.  (New section)  Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the agency may adopt, immediately, upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, such rules and regulations as the agency deems necessary to implement the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), which regulations shall be effective for a period not to exceed 180 days from the date of the filing.  Thereafter, the agency shall amend, adopt, or readopt the regulations in accordance with the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.).]2 21.   Section 89 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.52:18A-263) is amended to read as follows: 89.  a.  The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury may purchase unused tax credits awarded under a program listed in subsection b. of this section, including tax credit transfer certificates issued by the director in lieu of a tax credit allowed under such programs.  The director shall not pay consideration in excess of 75 percent of the credit amount to be purchased, except for a credit awarded under: (1)   the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), which shall be subject to the provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection d. of section 77 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-345); (2)   the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through C.34:1B-335), as amended and supplemented, for which the director shall pay an amount equal to 85 percent of the credit amount, provided that the issuance date of the tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate to the developer or the holder of such certificate occurred at least one year prior to the date of application to the director, and further provided that, if the application to the director is submitted after the sixth year of the eligibility period, the amount in excess of the reasonable and appropriate rate of return on investment that the developer is required to pay pursuant to subsection c. of section 60 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-328) shall increase to 50 percent; or (3)   the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.), for which the director shall pay an amount equal to 85 percent of the credit amount, provided that the issuance date of the tax credit certificate or tax credit transfer certificate to the developer or the holder of such certificate occurred at least one year prior to the date of application to the director. b.    The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury may purchase tax credits awarded under the following: (1)   the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through C.34:1B-276); (2)   the "Brownfield Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through C.34:1B-287); (3)   the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through C.34:1B-302); (4)   the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through C.34:1B-310); (5)   the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through C.34:1B-321); (6)   the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through C.34:1B-335); (7)   the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.); (8)   the Grow New Jersey Assistance Program established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2011, c.149 (C.34:1B-244); (9)   section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4); (10)  the State Economic Redevelopment and Growth Grant program established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489e); (11)  section 1 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b); (12)  section 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54A:4-12b); [and] (13)  the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.); and (14)  sections 3 through 7 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        through ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).2 (cf: P.L.2025, c.2, s.9) 22.   Section 98 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-362) is amended to read as follows: 98.  a.  The combined value of all tax credits awarded under the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276); the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287); the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302); the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310); the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321); the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335); the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.); section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4); the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.); [and] the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 ([C.34:1B-362 et seq.] C.34:1B-394 et al.); and P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not exceed an overall cap of $11.5 billion over a nine-year period, subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in this section.  Of this $11.5 billion, $2.5 billion shall be reserved for transformative projects approved under the Aspire Program. b.    (1)  The total value of tax credits awarded under any constituent program of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.), [and] the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 ([C.34:1B-362 et seq.] C.34:1B-394 et al.), and P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be subject to the following limitations, except as otherwise provided in subsection c. of this section: (a)   for tax credits awarded under the "Historic Property Reinvestment Act," sections 2 through 8 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-270 through 34:1B-276), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $50 million; (b)  (i)  for tax credits awarded under the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $50 million and the total value of tax credits awarded over the entirety of the nine-year period shall not exceed $100,000,000; (ii)  from the tax credits made available to the "Brownfields Redevelopment Incentive Program Act," sections 9 through 19 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-277 through 34:1B-287), the sum of $200,000,000 in tax credits shall be allocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.), which tax credits shall be sold through competitive auctions conducted pursuant to sections 3 through 7 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  All proceeds of the tax credit auctions shall be used by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency for the purposes authorized in subsection b. of section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (C        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the tax credits reallocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency shall not be subject to any requirements or conditions of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), as amended or supplemented; (c)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Innovation Evergreen Act," sections 20 through 34 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-288 through 34:1B-302), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $60 million and the total value of tax credits awarded over the entirety of the nine-year period shall not exceed $300,000,000; (d)   for tax credits awarded under the "Food Desert Relief Act," sections 35 through 42 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-303 through 34:1B-310), the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $40 million; (e)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321), and the "Cultural Arts Incentives Program Act," P.L.2023, c.197 (C.34:1B-383 et al.), the total value of tax credits awarded during the nine-year period shall not exceed $1,200,000,000; provided, however, tax credits shall not be available under the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321), until January 1, 2026.  Beginning January 1, 2026, the authority shall annually award tax credits under the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321), valuing no greater than $130 million for projects located in the 13 northern counties of the State, and the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $70 million for projects located in the eight southern counties of the State.  If during any year of operation of the "New Jersey Community-Anchored Development Act," sections 43 through 53 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-311 through 34:1B-321), the authority awards tax credits pursuant to the program in an amount less than the annual limitation for projects located in northern counties or southern counties, as applicable, the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in a subsequent year without consideration to the county in which a project is located; (f)   for tax credits awarded under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, the total value of tax credits annually awarded during each of the first six years of the nine-year period shall not exceed $1.1 billion.  If the authority awards tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitation, then the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be made available for qualified offshore wind projects awarded under section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4), pursuant to subparagraph (h) of this paragraph, projects awarded a tax credit pursuant to the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 ([C.34:1B-362 et seq.] C.34:1B-394 et al.), pursuant to subparagraph (k) of this paragraph, or New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies awarded under sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b), pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and subsection d. of this section.  During each of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $715 million for projects located in the northern counties of the State, and the authority shall annually award tax credits valuing no greater than $385 million for projects located in the southern counties of the State under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.).  If during any of the first six years of the nine-year period, the authority awards tax credits under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), in an amount less than the annual limitation for projects located in northern counties or southern counties, as applicable, the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in a subsequent year, provided that the uncommitted portion of tax credits shall be awarded for projects located in the applicable geographic area, except that (i) after the completion of the third year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy 50 percent of the uncommitted portion of tax credits for any previous year without consideration to the county in which a project is located; and (ii) after the completion of the sixth year of the nine-year period, the authority may deploy all available tax credits, including the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year, without consideration to the county in which a project is located; (g)   except as provided in subparagraph (j) of this paragraph, for tax credits awarded for transformative projects under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), the total value of tax credits awarded during the nine-year period shall not exceed $2.5 billion.  The total value of tax credits awarded for transformative projects in a given year shall not be subject to an annual limitation, except that the total value of tax credits awarded to any transformative project shall not exceed $400 million; (h)   from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $350,000,000 shall be made available for qualified offshore wind projects awarded a credit pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.34:1B-209.4) during the first three years of the nine-year period; (i)    beginning in fiscal year 2023, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, additional amounts shall be made available for New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b); (j)    beginning in fiscal year 2024, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 may be annually transferred for the award to transformative projects under the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335), provided that: (i) the remaining allocation of tax credits otherwise available for transformative projects, pursuant to subparagraph (g) of this paragraph, is less than $1,000,000,000; and (ii) the authority board determines that the transfer of tax credits is warranted based on such criteria as the authority deems appropriate, which may include the criteria set forth in paragraph (2) of this subsection.  If a transfer of tax credits is made pursuant to this subparagraph, the authority shall award no greater than 65 percent of the tax credits transferred pursuant to this subparagraph to transformative projects located in the northern counties of the State and no greater than 35 percent of the tax credits transferred pursuant to this subparagraph to transformative projects located in the southern counties of the State; [and] (k)   beginning in fiscal year 2025, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), but not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, an amount not to exceed $500,000,000 shall be made available for projects awarded a tax credit pursuant to the "Next New Jersey Program Act," P.L.2024, c.49 [(C.34:1B-362 et seq.)] (C.34:1B-394 et al.); and (l)  once the tax credits allocated for competitive auctions conducted pursuant to sections 3 through 7 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) pursuant to subsubparagraph (ii) of subparagraph (b) of this paragraph are exhausted, from the tax credits made available, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of this paragraph, to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 through 34:1B-335) and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), but not including tax credits awarded for transformative projects, the sum of $300,000,000 shall be made available to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.), which tax credits shall be sold through  competitive auctions conducted pursuant to sections 3 through 7 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The amount made available pursuant to this subparagraph shall be allocated in annual instalments, each of which is not to exceed the cap set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), as needed to conduct auctions pursuant to that section.  All proceeds of the tax credit auctions shall be used by the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency for the purposes authorized in subsection b. of section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (C        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, the tax credits reallocated to the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency shall not be subject to any requirements or conditions of the "New Jersey Economic Recovery Act of 2020," P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), as amended or supplemented. (2)   The authority may in any given year determine that it is in the State's interest to approve an amount of tax credits in excess of the annual limitations set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, but in no event more than $200,000,000 in excess of the annual limitation, upon a determination by the authority board that such increase is warranted based on specific criteria that may include: (i)    the increased demand for opportunities to create or retain employment and investment in the State as indicated by the volume of project applications and the amount of tax credits being sought by those applications; (ii)   the need to protect the State's economic position in the event of an economic downturn; (iii) the quality of project applications and the net economic benefit to the State and municipalities associated with those applications; (iv)  opportunities for project applications to strengthen or protect the competitiveness of the State under the prevailing market conditions; (v)   enhanced access to employment and investment for underserved populations in distressed municipalities and qualified incentives tracts; (vi)  increased investment and employment in high-growth technology sectors and in projects that entail collaboration with education institutions in the State; (vii)  increased development proximate to mass transit facilities; (viii)  any other factor deemed relevant by the authority. c.     In the event that the authority in any year approves projects for tax credits in an amount less than the annual limitations set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section, then the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation shall be available to be deployed by the authority in future years for projects under the same program; provided however, that in no event shall the aggregate amount of tax credits approved be in excess of the overall cap of $11.5 billion, and in no event shall the uncommitted portion of the annual limitation for any previous year be deployed after the conclusion of the nine-year period. d.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the uncommitted balance of the total value of tax credits authorized for award by the authority pursuant to subparagraph (f) of paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section to the "New Jersey Aspire Program Act," sections 54 through 67 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-322 et seq.), and the "Emerge Program Act," sections 68 through 81 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-336 et al.), shall be made available for tax credits allowed to New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of P.L.2018, c.56 (C.54:10A-5.39b and C.54A:4-12b).  The value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, made available to New Jersey studio partners, New Jersey film-lease production companies, and taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies pursuant to this subsection shall be as follows: (1)   in fiscal year 2023, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies; (2)   in fiscal year 2024, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners and $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies; and (3)   in fiscal year 2025, $250,000,000 for New Jersey studio partners, $250,000,000 for New Jersey film-lease production companies, and $300,000,000 for taxpayers, other than New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies. If the value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, approved to New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies in any fiscal year pursuant to this subsection is less than the cumulative total amount of tax credits permitted to be approved in that fiscal year, the authority shall certify the amount of the remaining tax credits available for approval to each such category in that fiscal year, and shall increase the cumulative total amount of tax credits permitted to be approved for New Jersey studio partners and New Jersey film-lease production companies in the subsequent fiscal year by the certified amount remaining for each such category from the prior fiscal year.2 (cf: P.L.2024, c.49, s.10) 23.   (New section)  As used in sections 4 through 7 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        through ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): ²Agency² means the New Jersey Housing and Mortgage Finance Agency, established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.530 (C.55:14K-1 et seq.). ²Director² means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. "Distressed older suburban municipality" means a municipality that is not designated by the agency as a targeted urban municipality, and that, in the determination of the agency, meets at least four of the following criteria: a.  has experienced a sustained drop in income levels compared to the region; b.  has an elevated percentage of residents living below 100 percent of the poverty line, adjusted for family size, established and adjusted under section 673 of the federal "Community Services Block Grant Act," (42 U.S.C. s.9902); c.  experiences high rates of unemployment or low labor force participation rates; d.  has a large share of homes built before 1960 and elevated rates of residential property vacancy and abandonment; e.  experiences stagnant or declining property values; f.  experiences declining commercial ratables; and g.  experiences declining municipal capacity as a consequence of budget stress. ²Four-Percent Low Income Housing Tax Credit² means the four-percent allocation from the federal Low Income Housing Tax Credit program established pursuant to section 42 of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.42). "Low- and moderate-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to less than 80 percent of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. "Middle-income workforce housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income of 80 percent or more, but not exceeding 120 percent, of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. "Targeted urban municipality" means the same as that term is defined by the agency pursuant to N.J.A.C.5:80-33.2, or successor regulation.2 24.   (New section)  a.  (1)  Beginning on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the agency shall sell up to $500,000,000 in tax credits over the course of no more than six years. (2)   The competitive auctions shall be conducted in a manner consistent with the processes set forth in section 24 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-292), as determined by the agency. The agency shall be permitted to join or be added to any contracts that the New Jersey Economic Development Authority has utilized for its auctions, although auctions held for the purposes of administering P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not be counted towards the limitation imposed pursuant to subsection d. of section 24 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-292) and the requirement on purchasers under paragraph (3) of subsection b. of section 24 of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-292) shall not apply. The agency shall deposit funds received at an auction pursuant to this subsection minus those reserved for administrative or operational costs into a nonlapsing account established and maintained by the agency for the purposes of administering P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (3)  The agency shall be limited to selling $100,000,000 in tax credits annually and shall not sell tax credits for less than 80 percent of the tax credit amount. b.    (1)  (a)  Fifty percent of the proceeds deposited into the nonlapsing account created pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section shall be reserved for use by the agency for the purposes of providing financial assistance to create middle-income workforce housing.  Fifty percent of the proceeds deposited into the nonlapsing account created pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section shall be reserved for use by the agency for the purposes of providing financial assistance to create low- and moderate-income housing toward the fulfillment of a municipalitys current or prior round fair share affordable housing obligation pursuant to the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.). (b)  The 50 percent set asides established by subparagraph (a) of this paragraph for monies deposited into the nonlapsing account in each program funding year, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section, shall remain in effect until December 31 of that year.  If any funds deposited into the nonlapsing account during that program funding year remain unreserved for qualified projects subject to the set asides after December 31 of the program funding year when the monies are deposited, the set aside shall no longer apply to those funds, which may then be used for any qualified project under sections 4 through 7 of P.L.    , c. (C.        through        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The initial program funding year shall begin on July 1, 2025, and shall conclude on December 31, 2025.  Each subsequent program funding year shall conform to the calendar year. (c)  In the distribution of proceeds pursuant to this section for the purposes of providing financial assistance to create low- and moderate-income housing toward the fulfillment of a municipalitys current or prior round fair share affordable housing obligation pursuant to the "Fair Housing Act," P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-301 et al.), the agency shall prioritize an application for development that is in a distressed older suburban municipality, as defined in section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (d)  Housing created pursuant to this section may include, but shall not be limited to, new construction or the rehabilitation or construction of residential units within multiple dwellings. (e)  Following the enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the agency shall promptly and actively promote the middle-income workforce housing component of the housing program established pursuant to this section to ensure that a substantial range of potential applicants to obtain funding to provide middle-income workforce housing are made aware of the program.  The promotion efforts of the agency shall include, but shall not be limited to: the provision of information sessions on the program and application process; and the provision of technical assistance to applicants in completing the application process. (2)  The agency shall promulgate guidelines for a housing program to fulfill the purposes of this section within 90 days following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) to govern the application and award processes for qualified projects seeking funds deposited under P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  In addition to any other eligibility requirements that the agency deems appropriate, the project financing subsidy authorized under this section shall only be made available to projects in receipt of a Four-Percent Low Income Housing Tax Credit administered by the agency. (3)  The agency may utilize up to five percent of the proceeds to reimburse for administrative and operational costs, including contracts necessary to hold the auction.2 25.   (New section)  A purchaser that submits a successful bid for the purchase of tax credits pursuant to section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall enter into a contract with the agency that includes payment information and the commitments made by the purchaser in its auction bid.  A purchaser that submits a successful bid for the purchase of tax credits pursuant to section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall pay by wire transfer the amount specified in its auction bid to the agency.  Upon receipt thereof, the Executive Director of the agency shall notify the director to issue tax credits in the amount approved.  Failure by the purchaser to pay the amount agreed upon on time shall disqualify the purchaser from purchasing the tax credits and the agency may reassign the right to purchase the credits to another bidder. Failure by the purchaser to adhere to the commitments made in its auction bid shall disqualify the purchaser from participating in future auctions and may result in the recapture of a portion of the tax credits.2 26.   (New section)  a.  A purchaser shall apply a credit awarded pursuant to section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) against the purchaser's State tax liability due pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5 for the current privilege period as of the date of the approval of the credits.  A purchaser may carry forward an unused credit resulting from the limitations of subsection b. of this section, if necessary, for use in the seven privilege periods next following the privilege period for which the credit is awarded. b.    The director shall prescribe the order of priority of the application of the credits awarded under section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and any other credits allowed by law.  The amount of a credit applied under section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for a privilege period, together with any other credits allowed by law, shall not reduce the tax liability of the purchaser to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5).2 27.   (New section)  a.  A purchaser may apply to the agency and the director for a tax credit transfer certificate in lieu of the purchaser being allowed to apply any amount of the tax credit against the purchaser's State tax liability.  A tax credit may be sold or assigned, in full or in part, to another person that may have a tax liability pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5.  The tax credit transfer certificate provided to the purchaser shall include a statement waiving the purchaser's right to claim the credit that the purchaser has elected to sell or assign. b.    The purchaser shall not sell or assign a tax credit transfer certificate allowed under this section for consideration received by the purchaser of less than 80 percent of the transferred credit amount before considering any further discounting to present value which shall be permitted.  The tax credit transfer certificate issued to a purchaser by the director shall be subject to any limitations and conditions imposed on the application of State tax credits pursuant to section 6 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and any other terms and conditions that the director may prescribe. c.     A buyer or assignee of a tax credit transfer certificate pursuant to this section shall not make any subsequent transfers, assignments, or sales of the tax credit transfer certificate. d.    Ten percent of the consideration received by a purchaser from the sale or assignment of a tax credit transfer certificate pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the director and deposited in the General Fund of the State. e.     The agency shall publish on its Internet website the following information concerning each tax credit transfer certificate approved by the agency and the director pursuant to this section: (1)   the name of the transferor; (2)   the name of the transferee; (3)   the value of the tax credit transfer certificate; (4)   the State tax against which the transferee may apply the tax credit; and (5)   the consideration received by the transferor.2 2[6.] 8.2  This act shall take effect immediately.